Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-840
Boundary bridge; bonds; election; form of ballot.

At any election held pursuant to section 39-838 or 39-839, the ballot used shall be substantially in the following form:

Shall (here enter name of county, township, precinct, city or village it is proposed shall vote bonds) issue bonds in the sum of (here insert the amount) dollars, to construct or aid in the construction of, as the case may be, a highway bridge (and if to aid in the construction, insert the name of the persons, firm or corporation to whom said bonds are to be donated) and to levy a tax for payment of the principal and interest.

Yes.....No.....

Laws 1895, c. 45, § 3, p. 189;

R.S.1913, § 2998;

C.S.1922, § 2750;

C.S.1929, § 39-836;

R.S.1943, § 39-840.